Hawaii, session 2025, SB342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii's state and county employees are not adequately supported during times of birth, adoption, fostering a new child, or caregiving for a family member during illness. Providing paid family leave to state and county employees could enhance recruitment and retention of quality employees and fulfill the government's role as a model employer.  Research has shown that paid family leave reduces employment turnover, saving recruitment, hiring, and training costs.  Paid leave has also been found to increase the productivity of the workforce and boost employee morale.  Support by the employer for family care is often highlighted as a main attractor for young, highly‑educated workers seeking employment and must therefore be seen as an investment in the State and counties' success. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish paid family leave for all state and county employees. SECTION 2.  Chapter 78, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§78-    Paid family leave for state and county employees.  (a)  Notwithstanding chapter 378, and if negotiated into a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to section 89-9, for those employees included in bargaining units pursuant to section 89-6, an employee shall be entitled to a total of five days of paid family leave during any calendar year for the purposes described in section 398-3(a); provided that paid family leave shall not be substituted by the employee's accrued and available vacation, sick leave, or other paid leave. (b)  An employee taking paid family leave shall be paid at the regular rate of pay for those regular hours during which the employee is absent from work without loss of seniority, pay, vacation, sick leave, or earned overtime accumulations. (c)  The taking of paid family leave shall not result in the loss of any employment benefit accrued before the date on which the leave commenced. (d)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to entitle or deny any employee to the accrual of any seniority or employment benefits during any period of leave, or any right, employment benefit, or position to which the employee would have been entitled had the employee not taken the leave." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.